Florida, session 2026, SB252.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âCreating a 20 Respectful and Open World for Natural Hair Actâ or âCROWN Act.â 21 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 1000.05, Florida 22 Statutes, is amended to read: 23 1000.05âDiscrimination against students and employees in 24 the Florida K-20 public education system prohibited; equality of 25 access required.â 26 (2)(a)âAs used in this section, the term âprotected 27 hairstyleâ means hair characteristics historically associated 28 with race, such as hair texture and styles, including, but not 29 limited to, afros, braids, locks, or twists. 30 (b)âDiscrimination on the basis of race, color, national 31 origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a 32 student or an employee in the state system of public K-20 33 education is prohibited. No person in this state shall, on the 34 basis of race, color, national origin, sex, disability, 35 religion, or marital status, be excluded from participation in, 36 be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination 37 under any public K-20 education program or activity, or in any 38 employment conditions or practices, conducted by a public 39 educational institution that receives or benefits from federal 40 or state financial assistance. Additionally, discrimination 41 based on a protected hairstyle against a student in the state 42 system of public K-20 education is prohibited. A student may not 43 be excluded from participation in, denied the benefits of, or 44 subjected to discrimination under any public K-20 education 45 program or activity on the basis of a protected hairstyle. 46 (c)(b)âThe criteria for admission to a program or course 47 may shall not have the effect of restricting access by students 48 persons of a particular race, color, national origin, sex, 49 disability, religion, or marital status or with a protected 50 hairstyle. 51 (d)(c)âAll public K-20 education classes must shall be 52 available to all students without regard to race, color, 53 protected hairstyle, national origin, sex, disability, religion, 54 or marital status; however, this is not intended to eliminate 55 the provision of programs designed to meet the needs of students 56 with limited proficiency in English, gifted students, or 57 students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with 58 specialized talents or skills. 59 (e)(d)âStudents may be separated by sex for a single-gender 60 program, for any portion of a class that deals with human 61 reproduction, or during participation in bodily contact sports. 62 For the purpose of this section, bodily contact sports include 63 wrestling, boxing, rugby, ice hockey, football, basketball, and 64 other sports in which the purpose or major activity involves 65 bodily contact. 66 (f)(e)âGuidance services, counseling services, and 67 financial assistance services in the state public K-20 education 68 system shall be available to students equally. Guidance and 69 counseling services, materials, and promotional events shall 70 stress access to academic and career opportunities for students 71 without regard to race, color, protected hairstyle, national 72 origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status. 73 Section 3.âSubsection (7) of section 1002.20, Florida 74 Statutes, is amended to read: 75 1002.20âK-12 student and parent rights.âParents of public 76 school students must receive accurate and timely information 77 regarding their childâs academic progress and must be informed 78 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12 79 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory 80 rights including, but not limited to, the following: 81 (7)âNONDISCRIMINATION.âAll education programs, activities, 82 and opportunities offered by public educational institutions 83 must be made available without discrimination on the basis of 84 race, ethnicity, national origin, gender, disability, religion, 85 or marital status, in accordance with the provisions of s. 86 1000.05. For purposes of this subsection, the term âraceâ is 87 inclusive of traits historically associated with race, 88 including, but not limited to, hair texture, hair type, and 89 protected hairstyles. The term âprotected hairstyleâ includes, 90 but is not limited to, afros, braids, locks, or twists. 91 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 92 1002.421, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 93 1002.421âState school choice scholarship program 94 accountability and oversight.â 95 (1)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âA private 96 school participating in an educational scholarship program 97 established pursuant to this chapter must be a private school as 98 defined in s. 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in 99 compliance with all requirements of this section in addition to 100 private school requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific 101 requirements identified within respective scholarship program 102 laws, and other provisions of Florida law that apply to private 103 schools, and must: 104 (a)âComply with the antidiscrimination provisions of 42 105 U.S.C. s. 2000d. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âraceâ 106 as used in 42 U.S.C. s. 2000d is inclusive of traits 107 historically associated with race, including, but not limited 108 to, hair texture, hair type, and protected hairstyles. The term 109 âprotected hairstyleâ includes, but is not limited to, afros, 110 braids, locks, or twists. 111 112 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private 113 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection, and 114 shall prohibit the school from enrolling new scholarship 115 students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school complies. If a 116 private school fails to meet the requirements of this subsection 117 or has consecutive years of material exceptions listed in the 118 report required under paragraph (q), the commissioner may 119 determine that the private school is ineligible to participate 120 in a scholarship program. 121 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.